Utah statutes.
76-10-3117.   Statute of limitations.

(1)  Any action brought by the attorney general pursuant to this act is barred if it is not commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues.

(2)  Any other action pursuant to this act is barred if it is not commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues, or within one year after the conclusion of an action brought by the state pursuant to this act based in whole or in part on any matter complained of in the subsequent action, whichever is the latter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

